Utah statutes.
63G-2-604.   Retention and disposition of records.
(1) (a)  Except for a governmental entity that is permitted to maintain its
own retention schedules under Part 7, Applicability to Political Subdivisions,
the Judiciary, and the Legislature, each governmental entity shall file with
the State Records Committee a proposed schedule for the retention and
disposition of each type of material that is defined as a record under this
chapter.
(b)  After a retention schedule is reviewed and approved by the State Records
Committee under Subsection 63G-2-502(1)(b), the governmental entity shall
maintain and destroy records in accordance with the retention schedule.
(c)  If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section has
not received an approved retention schedule for a specific type of material
that is classified as a record under this chapter, the model retention
schedule maintained by the state archivist shall govern the retention and
destruction of that type of material.
(2)  A retention schedule that is filed with or approved by the State Records
Committee under the requirements of this section is a public record.
